incubator/apertium-ru-uk.uk.dix
    <pardef n="/prpers__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>мене</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="mf"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>мені</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="mf"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>мене</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="mf"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>мені</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="mf"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>мною</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="mf"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>я</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="mf"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>нас</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><s n="mf"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>нам</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><s n="mf"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>нас</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><s n="mf"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>наc</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><s n="mf"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>нами</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><s n="mf"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ми</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><s n="mf"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>тебе</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="mf"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>тобі</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="mf"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>тебе</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="mf"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>тобі</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="mf"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>тобою</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="mf"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ти</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="mf"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>вас</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="mf"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>вам</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="mf"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>вас</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="mf"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>вас</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="mf"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>вами</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="mf"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ви</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="mf"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>його</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ma"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>нього</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ma"/><s n="gen"/><s n="pprep"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>йому</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ma"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>його</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ma"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ньому</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ma"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>нім</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ma"/><s n="loc"/><s n="pprep"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ним</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ma"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>він</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ma"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>його</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="mi"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>нього</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="mi"/><s n="gen"/><s n="pprep"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>йому</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="mi"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>його</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="mi"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ньому</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="mi"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>нім</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="mi"/><s n="loc"/><s n="pprep"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ним</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="mi"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>він</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="mi"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>її</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="f"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>неї</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="f"/><s n="gen"/><s n="pprep"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>її</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="f"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>її</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="f"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ній</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="f"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>нею</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="f"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>вона</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="f"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>його</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nt"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>нього</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nt"/><s n="gen"/><s n="pprep"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>йому</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nt"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>його</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nt"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ньому</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nt"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>нім</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nt"/><s n="loc"/><s n="pprep"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

    <e lm="prpers"><i></i><par n="/prpers__prn"/></e>
